South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S15.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-1-1100 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-1-1100. A person found to be an habitual offender under the provisions of this article, who subsequently is convicted of operating a motor vehicle, except for a moped when the operator is issued a valid moped operator's license, in this State while the decision of the Department of Motor Vehicles prohibiting the operation is in effect, but not including any time the person may remain suspended past the suspension dates due to unmet reinstatement requirements, is guilty of a felony and must be imprisoned not more than five years. For the purpose of enforcing this section, in any case in which the accused is charged with driving a motor vehicle while his driver's license or permit is suspended or revoked or is charged with driving without a license, the department, before hearing the charges, shall determine whether the person has been adjudged an habitual offender and is barred from operating a motor vehicle on the highways of this State.  If the person is found to be an habitual offender, the department shall notify the solicitor or Attorney General and he shall cause the appropriate criminal charges to be lodged against the offender. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----